Tennessee, session 114, HB0919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-6-121(a)(1)(C), is amended by
deleting the language:
At least one (1) employee representative shall be from organized labor.
and substituting instead the language:
The employee representative appointed by the governor must be from an entity
representing organized labor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and shall apply to appointments made on or after the effective date of this act.
HB0919
002839
- 1 -